test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-tiatu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - tiätu: # u-stems
    tiätu+N+Sg+Nom: tiätu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Gen: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Acc: tiäđu
    tiätu+N+Sg+Ill: tiätun
    tiätu+N+Sg+Loc: tiäđust
    tiätu+N+Sg+Com: [tiäđuin, tiäˊđoin]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: [tiäđuttáá, tiäˊđottáá]
    tiätu+N+Ess: tiättun
    tiätu+N+Par: tiättud
    tiätu+N+Pl+Nom: [tiäđuh, tiäˊđoh]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Gen: [tiäđui, tiäˊđoi]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Acc: [tiäđuid, tiäˊđoid]
    tiätu+N+Pl+Ill: tiäđoid
    tiätu+N+Pl+Loc: tiäđuin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Com: tiäˊđuiguin
    tiätu+N+Pl+Abe: tiäˊđuittáá
